Hawaii statutes.
§461-11.4 Vaccinations; children.
(a) A pharmacist may administer a vaccine to persons between fourteen and
seventeen years of age pursuant to a valid prescription. The pharmacist shall
verify that the prescriber or the prescriber's authorized agent is the
patient's medical home.

(b) After the vaccination is administered, the
pharmacist shall immediately provide to the patient a vaccination record
including the following information:

(1) The patient's name and date of birth;

(2) The type of vaccine administered; and

(3) The date and location that the vaccine was
administered.

(c) The pharmacist shall provide within
seventy-two hours to the medical home and within five business days to the
department of health immunization registry the same information provided to the
patient pursuant to subsection (b) as well as the following:

(1) The name of the vaccine product that was
administered, including the manufacturer, lot number, and expiration date;

(2) The method of administration; and

(3) The anatomical site of administration.

(d) All pharmacists who administer vaccines to
persons between the ages of fourteen and seventeen years shall complete a
training program approved by the Accreditation Council of Pharmacy Education
for which a certificate of completion is issued. The pharmacist shall complete
the training program and submit the completion certificate for the training
program to the board prior to administering any vaccine to persons between the
ages of fourteen and seventeen years.

(e) For the purposes of this section,
"medical home" means the primary care physician who, working in
collaboration with the family, oversees the acute, chronic, and preventive
health needs of the patient in a comprehensive, coordinated, and continuous
fashion. [L 2012, c 42, §2; am L 2015, c 36, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next